Illinois, session 104th, SB1735.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Estate and Generation-Skipping 5Transfer Tax Act is amended by changing Sections 3 and 4 and by 6adding Section 19 as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 405/3)  (from Ch. 120, par. 405A-3)8    Sec. 3. Illinois estate tax. 9    (a) Imposition of Tax. An Illinois estate tax is imposed 10on every taxable transfer involving transferred property 11having a tax situs within the State of Illinois.12    (b) Amount of tax. On estates of persons dying before 13January 1, 2003, the amount of the Illinois estate tax shall be 14the state tax credit, as defined in Section 2 of this Act, with 15respect to the taxable transfer reduced by the lesser of: 16        (1) the amount of the state tax credit paid to any 17    other state or states; and 18        (2) the amount determined by multiplying the maximum 19    state tax credit allowable with respect to the taxable 20    transfer by the percentage which the gross value of the 21    transferred property not having a tax situs in Illinois 22    bears to the gross value of the total transferred 23    property.  SB1735- 2 -LRB104 06570 HLH 16606 b1    (c) On estates of persons dying on or after January 1, 2003 2and dying before January 1, 2026, the amount of the Illinois 3estate tax shall be the state tax credit, as defined in Section 42 of this Act, reduced by the amount determined by multiplying 5the state tax credit with respect to the taxable transfer by 6the percentage which the gross value of the transferred 7property not having a tax situs in Illinois bears to the gross 8value of the total transferred property. 9    (d) On estates of person dying on or after January 1, 2026 10and dying before January 1, 2027, the amount of the Illinois 11estate tax shall be the amount calculated under subsection 12(c), multiplied by 0.8. 13    (e) On estates of person dying on or after January 1, 2027 14and dying before January 1, 2028, the amount of the Illinois 15estate tax shall be the amount calculated under subsection 16(c), multiplied by 0.6. 17    (f) On estates of person dying on or after January 1, 2028 18and dying before January 1, 2029, the amount of the Illinois 19estate tax shall be the amount calculated under subsection 20(c), multiplied by 0.4. 21    (g) On estates of person dying on or after January 1, 2029 22and dying before January 1, 2030, the amount of the Illinois 23estate tax shall be the amount calculated under subsection 24(c), multiplied by 0.2. 25    (h) No tax shall be imposed under this Act for persons 26dying on or after January 1, 2030.   SB1735- 3 -LRB104 06570 HLH 16606 b1(Source: P.A. 93-30, eff. 6-20-03; 94-419, eff. 8-2-05.) 2    (35 ILCS 405/4)  (from Ch. 120, par. 405A-4)3    Sec. 4. Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax. 4    (a) Imposition of tax. An Illinois generation-skipping 5transfer tax is imposed on every taxable transfer resulting in 6federal generation-skipping transfer tax involving transferred 7property having a tax situs within the State of Illinois.8    (b) Amount of tax. The amount of the Illinois 9generation-skipping transfer tax shall be the maximum state 10tax credit allowable with respect to the taxable transfer, 11reduced by the lesser of: 12        (1) the amount of the state tax credit paid to any 13    other state or states; and 14        (2) the amount determined by multiplying the maximum 15    state tax credit allowable with respect to the taxable 16    transfer by the percentage which the gross value of the 17    transferred property not having a tax situs in Illinois 18    bears to the gross value of the total transferred 19    property.20    (c) For transfers occurring on or after January 1, 2026 21and occurring before January 1, 2027, the amount of the 22Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax shall be the amount 23calculated under subsection (b), multiplied by 0.8. 24    (d) For transfers occurring on or after January 1, 2027 25and occurring before January 1, 2028, the amount of the   SB1735- 4 -LRB104 06570 HLH 16606 b1Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax shall be the amount 2calculated under subsection (b), multiplied by 0.6. 3    (e) For transfers occurring on or after January 1, 2028 4and occurring before January 1, 2029, the amount of the 5Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax shall be the amount 6calculated under subsection (b), multiplied by 0.4. 7    (f) For transfers occurring on or after January 1, 2029 8and occurring before January 1, 2030, the amount of the 9Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax shall be the amount 10calculated under subsection (b), multiplied by 0.2. 11    (h) No tax shall be imposed under this Act for persons 12dying on or after January 1, 2030. 13(Source: P.A. 86-737.) 14    (35 ILCS 405/19 new)15    Sec. 19. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 2031. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.